Louisiana, session 2026, HB1113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:13.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§13.1. Publication of copies of legislative instruments; proposed amendments;
unofficial engrossment; failure to comply
A. A copy of each legislative instrument prefiled with the Clerk of the House
or the Secretary of the Senate or introduced in either house shall be made available
through the website of Legislature of Louisiana.
B. For each amendment set proposed to a legislative instrument that is made
available through the website of the Legislature of Louisiana an unofficial engrossed
version of the instrument that includes the proposed amendments shall immediately
be made available through the website of the Legislature of Louisiana when the
amendment set is made available through the website of the Legislature of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2673 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1113
C. The failure to make a copy of each legislative instrument or an unofficial
engrossment available through the website of the Legislature of Louisiana as
required by this Section due to a technological failure beyond the control of the
legislature or beyond its ability to resolve timely is not a violation of the provisions
of this Section.